Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-162
Effect of failure to have certificate
of authority.

(RULLCA
808) (a) A foreign limited liability company transacting business in this
state may not maintain an action or proceeding in this state unless it has
a certificate of authority to transact business in this state.

(b) The failure of a
foreign limited liability company to have a certificate of authority to transact
business in this state does not impair the validity of a contract or act of
the company or prevent the company from defending an action or proceeding
in this state.

(c)
A member or manager of a foreign limited liability company is not liable for
the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of the company solely because
the company transacted business in this state without a certificate of authority.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 62.